Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 3 Regulatory Powers of Administration

39-3-1.
Services for which certificate of necessity required.

No public utility, whether privately owned or a quasi-public agency, shall distribute electricity or furnish or sell gas in any town or city in which any other public utility is at the time distributing electricity or furnishing or selling gas to the public generally, unless the public utility desiring to distribute electricity or to furnish or sell gas shall first have obtained a certificate from the division of public utilities and carriers certifying that public convenience and necessity require the same. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require a certificate to be obtained as a condition of distributing electricity or furnishing or selling gas in any town or city by any public utility that was actually distributing electricity or furnishing or selling gas to the public generally in the town or city on or prior to January 1, 1996, or by any successor to the public utility. The division shall not grant the certificate to any electric distribution company if the electric distribution company that is distributing electricity in the town or city offers to provide distribution service to all customers served by any nonregulated power producer, whether affiliated or not, on comparable prices and terms approved pursuant to this title, including the transition charge pursuant to §

39-1-27.4

. A copy of any application filed by the Block Island Power Company with either the commission or the division shall be provided by the Block Island Power Company to the New Shoreham town clerk by certified mail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 59; P.L. 1926, ch. 767, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-1

; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 5; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 5; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 106; P.L. 2002, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 361, § 1.

39-3-1.1.
Purchasing cooperatives.

Purchasing cooperatives may at any time be organized consisting of any group of electricity consumers for the purpose of negotiating for electric power from nonregulated power producers. The purchasing cooperatives shall be considered to be associations of electricity consumers organized solely for the purpose of negotiating the purchase of electric power by members of the cooperative. Purchasing cooperatives are specifically not required to be legal entities and are hereby prohibited from engaging in resale of electric power. Electricity consumers will maintain individual accounts with the nonregulated power producer with which a contract is concluded. Electricity consumers may withdraw from a purchasing cooperative at any time by providing thirty (30) days’ notice to the cooperative and to nonregulated power producers with which a purchasing cooperative has reached an agreement. Nothing in this section shall prevent a cooperative from becoming a legal entity or utilizing a legal entity to negotiate for rates for the purchasing cooperative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 106.

39-3-1.2.
Aggregation of electrical load by municipality or group of municipalities.

The legislative authority of a municipality may adopt an ordinance or resolution, under which it may aggregate in accordance with this section one or more classes of the retail electrical loads located, respectively, within the municipality or town and, for that purpose, may enter into service agreements to facilitate for those loads the sale and purchase of electricity. The legislative authority also may exercise this authority jointly with any other legislative authority. An ordinance or resolution under this section shall specify whether the aggregation will occur only with the prior consent of each person owning, occupying, controlling, or using an electric load center proposed to be aggregated or will occur automatically for all persons pursuant to the opt-out requirements of this section. Nothing in this section, however, authorizes the aggregation of retail electric loads of an electric load center that is located in the certified territory of a nonprofit electric supplier or an electric load center served by transmission or distribution facilities of a municipal electric utility.

No legislative authority pursuant to an ordinance or resolution under this section that provides for automatic aggregation as described in this section, shall aggregate the electrical load of any electric load center located within its jurisdiction unless it in advance clearly discloses to the person owning, occupying, controlling, or using the load center that the person will be enrolled automatically in the aggregation program and will remain so enrolled unless the person affirmatively elects by a stated procedure not to be so enrolled. The disclosure shall state prominently the rates, charges, and other terms and conditions of enrollment. The stated procedure shall allow any person enrolled in the aggregation program the opportunity, at a minimum, to opt-out of the program every two (2) years, without paying a switching fee. Any person who leaves the aggregation program pursuant to the stated procedure shall default to the last-resort service until the person chooses an alternative supplier.

A governmental aggregator under this section is not a public utility engaging in the wholesale purchase and resale of electricity, and the aggregated service is not a wholesale utility transaction. A governmental aggregator shall be subject to supervision and regulation by the commission only to the extent of any competitive retail electric service it provides and commission authority.

A town may initiate a process to authorize aggregation by a majority vote of a town meeting or of the town council. A city may initiate a process to authorize aggregation by a majority vote of the city council, with the approval of the mayor, or the city manager. Two (2) or more municipalities may, as a group, initiate a process jointly to authorize aggregation by a majority vote of each particular municipality as required in this section.

Upon the applicable requisite authority under this section, the legislative authority shall develop a plan of operation and governance for the aggregation program so authorized. Before adopting a plan under this section, the legislative authority shall hold at least one public hearing on the plan. Before the hearing, the legislative authority shall publish notice of the hearing once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction. The notice shall summarize the plan and state the date, time, and location of any hearing. A municipality or group of municipalities establishing load aggregation pursuant to this section shall develop a plan, for review by its citizens, detailing the process and consequences of aggregation. The plan shall identify which classes of customers may participate, based on their applicable electric distribution company tariff or rate schedule. Any municipal load aggregation plan established pursuant to this section shall provide for universal access to all applicable customers and equitable treatment of applicable classes of customers and shall meet any requirements established by law or the commission concerning aggregated service. The plan shall be filed with the commission, for its final review and approval, and shall include, without limitation, an organizational structure of the program, its operations, and its funding; the process for establishing rates and allocating costs among participants; the methods for entering and terminating agreements with other entities; the rights and responsibilities of program participants; and termination of the program. The plan must also include the terms and conditions under which retail customers who or that have chosen to opt-out of the aggregated service may take service from the aggregated entity. At the time of the legislative authority’s filing of the plan with the commission, a copy of the proposed plan filing shall be provided to the electric distribution company whose customers would be included in the plan. Prior to its decision, the commission shall conduct a public hearing. Following approval of the plan, the legislative authority may solicit bids from nonregulated power producers pursuant to the methods established by the plan. The legislative authority shall report the results of this solicitation and proposed agreement awards to the commission. The legislative authority shall have the right to terminate the operation of the plan by placing its customers on last-resort service. If the legislative authority terminates the operation of the plan and places customers on last-resort service, a municipality seeking to form a new municipal aggregation load must submit a new plan to the commission for approval, in accordance with this section, before the customers may enroll in a new aggregation program.

Any retail customer in a municipality with an approved aggregation plan may elect instead to receive retail supply from another licensed retail supplier or from the local distribution company. Within thirty (30) days of the date the aggregated entity is fully operational, ratepayers who or that have not affirmatively elected an alternative authorized supplier shall be transferred to the aggregated entity subject to the opt-out provision in this section. Following adoption of aggregation as specified above, the program shall allow any retail customer to opt-out and choose any supplier or provider that the retail customer wishes. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any city or town or any municipal retail load aggregator to restrict the ability of retail electric customers to obtain or receive service from any authorized provider of it.

It shall be the duty of the aggregated entity to fully inform participating ratepayers in advance of automatic enrollment that they are to be automatically enrolled and that they have the right to opt-out of the aggregated entity without penalty. In addition, such disclosure shall prominently state all charges to be made and shall include full disclosure of the standard-offer rate, how to access it, and the fact that it is available to them without penalty, if they are currently on standard-offer service. The commission shall furnish, without charge, to any citizen a list of all other supply options available to them in a meaningful format that shall enable comparison of price and product.

The municipality or group of municipalities shall, within two (2) years of approval of its plan, or such further time as the commission may allow, provide written notice to the commission that its plan is implemented. The commission may revoke certification of the aggregation plan if the municipality or group of municipalities fails to substantially implement the plan.

The commission may, from time to time, promulgate rules by which the legislative authority may request information from the electric distribution company or companies whose customers would be included in its plan. These rules shall ensure that municipalities have reasonable and timely access to information pertinent to the formation of the plan and solicitation of bids to serve customers; that confidentiality of individuals is protected; and that charges for production of data are reasonable and not unduly burdensome to the legislative authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 422, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 4.

39-3-2.
Persons and companies eligible for certificates.

No certificate shall be issued to any person who is not a citizen resident within this state, or to any association, unless all members of the association are citizens of this state, or to any corporation unless the corporation has been created by special act of the general assembly upon petition for the same. Notice of the pendency of the petition shall be given in such manner as the general assembly may by general law or special act prescribe; provided, however, that the prohibition contained in this section shall not apply to any corporation lawfully doing business in this state as a public utility prior to March 1, 1926.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 59; P.L. 1926, ch. 767, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-2

; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 5; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 5.

39-3-3.
Certificate requirement for water carriers.

No common carrier of persons and/or property operating upon water between termini within this state shall hereafter furnish or sell its services unless the common carrier shall first have made application to and obtained a certificate from the division certifying that public convenience and necessity required the services. A filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100) must accompany all filings made pursuant to this section. Certificates issued under this section shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. The renewal fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and shall be submitted with the renewal form. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues; provided, however, that this fee shall not apply to any city or town, to any agency or department of any city or town of the state, or to any nonprofit corporation in the tourism industry.

A copy of any application filed with either the commission or the division by a water common carrier that includes a New Shoreham terminus shall be provided by the water common carrier to the New Shoreham town clerk by certified mail.

Notwithstanding any provision of §§

39-5-1

and/or

42-35-15

, or any other provision of the general or public laws to the contrary, no agency nor reviewing court may order an interlocutory stay of any order of the division with respect to an application entered under §

39-3-3.1

, and/or certificate under §

39-3-3.1

. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit the right of any petitioner, public utility, party in interest, or other person or entity aggrieved by an order of the division entered under § 39-3-3.1, from seeking judicial review in accordance with §§

39-5-1

and/or

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 55; P.L. 1942, ch. 1249, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2795, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3403, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-3

; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 117; P.L. 2002, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 580, § 1.

39-3-3.1.
Petition for certificate by water carrier — Notice of pendency.

A petition in writing for the issuance of a certificate under §

39-3-3

shall first be filed with the division of public utilities and carriers by the common carrier desiring to obtain such certificate. Upon receipt of the petition, the division shall fix a time and place of hearing thereon and shall give notice as it may prescribe of the pendency of the petition and of the time and place of a hearing thereon to the petitioner, to the mayor and also any city manager of each city, and to the president of the town council and also any town manager for each town, in which the petitioner desires to pick up or discharge passengers. The division shall also publish a notice of the hearing at least ten (10) days prior to the date thereof in a newspaper of general circulation in each city or town in which the petitioner desires to pick up or discharge passengers. After the hearing the division shall enter an order granting or refusing to grant the petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 504, § 2.

39-3-4.
Water carriers entitled to certificate as of right.

Any person, corporation, or authority who or that has lawfully been doing business as a common carrier of persons and/or property upon water between termini within this state during a seven-year period, seasonally or otherwise, prior to April 30, 1943, and any cooperative association that, although not yet operating between its proposed termini within this state, has been formed for the purpose of providing a means of transportation by water, and that has been incorporated under the provisions of chapter 8 of title 7, prior to April 30, 1954, shall be entitled as a matter of right and without public hearing thereon, to receive a certificate of convenience and necessity from the division setting forth the scope and termini of its operation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 55; P.L. 1942, ch. 1249, § 1; 1951, ch. 2795, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3403, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-4

.

39-3-5.
Petition for certificate of necessity — Notice of pendency.

A petition in writing for the issuance of a certificate under §

39-3-1

shall first be filed with the division of public utilities and carriers by the public utility desiring to obtain the certificate. Upon receipt of the petition, the division shall fix a time and a place for a hearing thereon, and shall give such notice as it may prescribe of the pendency of the petition and of the time and place of the hearing thereon to the petitioner, to the mayor of each city, and to the president of the town council of each town, in which the petitioner desires to furnish or sell gas or electricity, and to any public utility furnishing or selling gas or electricity in the town or city, and shall give a public hearing upon the petition. After the hearing the division of public utilities and carriers shall enter an order granting or refusing to grant the petition.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 60; P.L. 1926, ch. 767, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 56; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-5

; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 6; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 5.

39-3-6.
Appeals.

Any petitioner or any public utility or other party in interest aggrieved by any order of the division granting or refusing to grant the petition, or rescinding, altering, or amending any previous action of the division, may appeal to the superior court as provided in §

39-5-1

, and all the other provisions of chapters 1 — 5 of this title relative to appeals shall apply to appeals from any order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 6; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 5; P.L. 1984, ch. 81, § 12.

39-3-7.
Fixing standards for service.

The commission shall periodically, after having given each public utility concerned reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard, determine and fix by order the standard amount, quality, pressure, initial voltage, and character of each kind of product or service to be furnished or rendered by each public utility, and standard condition or conditions pertaining to furnishing or rendering the same, and thereafter each public utility shall furnish and render the same accordingly. The hearing prescribed by this section may be held simultaneously with the hearing prescribed by §

39-3-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 5.

39-3-7.1.
Prohibited practices.

The use of “master-meters,” so-called, in apartment or tenement houses containing more than ten (10) apartments or dwelling units is hereby prohibited; provided, however, that this section shall only apply to apartment houses, construction of which is commenced after July 1, 1977. Each apartment or dwelling unit shall have a measuring device or meter for the purpose of measuring the electricity used only by that apartment. The commission shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to the multifamily dwellings constructed for the exclusive use of persons who are elderly and/or disabled through public financing, whenever the organization sponsoring the construction shall elect to use a single meter for all, or designated portions, of the housing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 88; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 88.

39-3-8.
Standards for measurement and testing of service.

The division shall ascertain and fix adequate and serviceable standards for the measurement of the quality, pressure, initial voltage, or other condition pertaining to the supply of the product or service rendered by any public utility, and prescribe reasonable regulations for the examination and testing of the product or service and for the measurement thereof. It shall establish reasonable rules, regulations, specifications, and standards to secure accuracy of all meters and appliances for measurement, and every public utility is required to carry into effect all orders issued by the division relative thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-8

.

39-3-9.
Testing of measuring devices.

The division shall provide for the examination and testing of any and all appliances used for measuring any product or service of any public utility. Any consumer or user may have any appliances tested upon payment of the fees fixed by the division. The division shall declare and establish reasonable fees to be paid for the testing of appliances on the request of the consumers or users, the fee to be paid by the consumer or user at the time of his or her request, but to be paid by the public utility and repaid to the consumer or user if the appliances be found defective or incorrect or to the disadvantage of the consumer or user. A meter shall be deemed correct for the purpose of this section if it appears from the examination or test that it does not vary more than two percent (2%) from the standard approved by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-9

.

39-3-10.
Filing and availability of rate schedules.

Every public utility shall file with the public utilities administrator, within a time to be fixed by the administrator, schedules that shall be open to public inspection, showing all rates, tolls, and charges it has established and that are in force at the time for any service performed by it within the state, or for any service in connection therewith or performed by any public utility controlled or operated by it. A copy of so much of the schedules as the administrator shall deem necessary for the use of the public shall be printed in plain type, or typewritten, and kept on file in every station or office of the public utility where payments are made by the consumers or users, open to the public in such form and place as to be readily accessible and conveniently inspected, and as the administrator may order. The administrator may determine and prescribe the form in which the schedules, required by this section to be kept open to the public inspection, shall be prepared and arranged, provided, that with respect to public utilities subject to the federal Interstate Commerce Act, 49 U.S.C. § 501 et seq., so-called, the form of the schedules shall be that as from time to time prescribed by the Interstate Commerce Commission.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) herein, a public utility may post on its website the rates, tolls, and charges of any retail telecommunications service performed by it within the state for any business customers. Subsection (a) herein shall not apply to any service so posted, and such public utility shall not be required to file with the public utilities administrator or publish any schedule or tariff for such service. Upon written notice to the public utilities administrator, the public utility may withdraw any schedule or tariff previously filed with the administrator for any service so posted.

Nothing in subsection (b) herein or in §

39-2-5(12)

shall derogate from the statutory authority of the commission or of the division, including, but not limited to, the authority to protect ratepayers from unreasonable rates. Nor shall anything in subsection (b) herein or in §

39-2-5(12)

derogate from the common law or statutory authority of the attorney general, including, but not limited to, the authority to enforce consumer protection or unfair or deceptive trade practice statutes and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 48; P.L. 1918, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 45; P.L. 1949, ch. 2172, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-10

; P.L. 2011, ch. 132, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 148, § 2.

39-3-11.
Notice of change in rates — Suspension of change — Hearings.

No change shall be made in the rates, tolls, and charges that have been filed and published by any public utility in compliance with the requirements of §

39-3-10

, except after thirty (30) days’ notice to the commission and to the public published as provided in §

39-3-10

, which shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the schedule then in force, and the time when the changed rates, tolls, or charges will go into effect. Whenever the commission receives notice of any change or changes proposed to be made in any schedule filed under the provisions of § 39-3-10, the commission shall hold a public hearing and make investigation as to the propriety of the proposed change or changes. After notice of any investigation, the commission shall have power, by any order served upon the public utility affected, to suspend the taking effect of the change or changes pending the decision thereof, but not for a longer period than eight (8) months beyond the time when the change or changes would otherwise take effect. Each hearing and investigation shall be conducted as expeditiously as may be practicable, and with a minimum of delay. Within ninety (90) days after the completion of any hearing, the commission shall make such order in reference to any proposed rate, toll, or charge as may be proper. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the commission shall periodically hold a public hearing and make investigation as to the propriety of rates when charged by any public utility and shall make such order in reference to the rate, toll, or charge as may be just. The hearing prescribed by this section may be held simultaneously with the hearing prescribed by §

39-3-7

. In the event of an appeal from an order of the commission in any hearing under this section, the order shall remain in full force and effect during the pendency of said appeal.

Upon receipt from a common carrier of persons and/or property upon water of a notice of any change proposed to be made in any schedule filed pursuant to §

39-3-10

, the commission shall give notice as it may prescribe of the pendency of the proposal and of the time and place of the hearing thereon to the mayor and also any city manager of each city, and to the president of the town council and also any town manager of each town in which the carrier picks up or discharges passengers. The commission shall also publish a notice of the hearing at least ten (10) days prior to the date thereof in a newspaper of general circulation in each city or town in which the carrier picks up or discharges passengers. In all other respects, hearings and investigations with respect to the proposals by the carriers shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

The Kent County Water Authority shall provide notice by certified mail of rate increase requests to the several fire districts that purchase water from the authority.

Costs incurred by electric distribution companies for filing rates, tolls, and charges, for participating in hearings and investigations prior to December 31, 2000, or for appealing commission decisions rendered prior to December 31, 2000, pursuant to this section shall not be included in the rates, tolls, or charges established by the commission pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 48; P.L. 1918, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 45; P.L. 1949, ch. 2172, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-11

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 5; P.L. 1977, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 48, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 504, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 106; P.L. 2009, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 79, § 1.

39-3-11.1.
Changes in rates of publicly owned water authorities.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the commission shall not have the power to suspend the taking effect of any change or changes in the rates, tolls, and charges filed and published in compliance with the requirements of §§

39-3-10

and

39-3-11

by any public waterworks or water service owned or furnished by a city, town, or any other municipal corporation defined as a public utility in §

39-1-2

, when the change or changes are proposed to be made solely for the purpose of making payments or compensation to any city or town for reimbursement of any loans or advances of money previously issued to any public waterworks or water service by any city or town under existing contracts or arrangements; provided, however, that the change or changes shall take effect subject to refund or credit pending further investigation, hearing, and order by the commission within eight (8) months after the effective date. The public waterworks or water service shall file with the commission the new rate schedule along with the documentary evidence of the indebtedness supporting the new rates. Further, the rate schedule shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the service area by the waterworks or water service at least ten (10) days prior to the effective date thereof.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to bar recovery of loans or advances of money not otherwise reflected in existing rates, tolls, and charges issued to May 19, 1982.

In setting rates for publicly owned water authorities, the commission shall not require the payment of rental fees for fire hydrants from any municipality that has prohibited such fees by ordinance as provided in §

45-39-4

and has given notice to the commission of the ordinance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 428, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 278, § 1.

39-3-11.2.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 37, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 38, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 31, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 39, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 31, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 93, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 122, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 9, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 10, § 3, effective July 1, 2010.

39-3-11.3.
Providence Water Supply Board transfer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Providence Water Supply Board shall transfer to the general fund of the city of Providence an amount equal to five percent (5%) per annum times the annual gross revenues of the Providence Water Supply Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2004, and for the next two (2) succeeding fiscal years. This transfer shall not be included as part of the Providence Water Supply Board’s rates approved by a final unappealable order of the public utilities commission for the same three (3) fiscal years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 12.

39-3-12.
Burden of proof to sustain increased rates — Modification of requirements.

At any hearing involving any proposed increase in any rate, toll, or charge, the burden of proof to show that the increase is necessary in order to obtain a reasonable compensation for the service rendered shall be upon the public utility; provided, that the commission may, in its discretion and for good cause shown, allow changes within less time than required by the notice specified in §

39-3-11

, and without holding the hearing and investigation therein provided for, or modify the requirements of §

39-3-11

with respect to filing and publishing tariffs, either in the particular instance or by general order applicable to special or particular circumstances or conditions, or may enter an interim order prescribing a temporary schedule of rates, tolls, and charges pending the completion of its investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 48; P.L. 1918, ch. 1651, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 45; P.L. 1949, ch. 2172, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-12

; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 3.

39-3-12.1.
Information required of water utility.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no water company, supplier, or water utility regulated by the commission shall be allowed to file its rate schedules or notice of changes in rates unless it shall also file a statement containing the following information:

The status of its physical plant, including the volume of its water supply and the source of the supply.

The maintenance policy of the utility, to include the date distribution pipes were last installed, and the length of pipe installed for at least a ten-year (10) duration.

The name and cost of each chemical introduced into the water supply during the most recent six-month (6) period, including the amount used and the purpose for the use.

The policy of the utility toward future expansion and renovation of the physical plant, including the amount of funds expended within the preceding year and expected to be expended within the next year for expansion, renovation, equipment purchase, and/or research and development.

Copies of the statements will be filed with the city and town councils of those cities and towns serviced by the utility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 251, § 1.

39-3-12.2.
Certain advertising costs prohibited on rate base.

No electric utility, as defined in chapter 1 of this title, may include as part of its rate base any expense for advertising, either direct or indirect, that promotes the construction of a nuclear facility for the generation of electricity, and no utility so regulated may furnish support of any kind, direct or indirect, to any subsidiary, group, association, or individual for advertising and include the expense as part of its rate base. The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to require public disclosure of all advertising expenses, of whatever kind, either direct or indirect, and to otherwise effectuate the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 7, § 1.

39-3-13.
Emergency suspension of rate schedules.

The division shall have power, when deemed by it necessary to prevent injury to the business or interest of the people or any public utility of this state in case of any emergency to be judged of by the division, to permit any public utility to temporarily alter, amend, or suspend any existing rates, schedules, and order relating to or affecting any public utility or part of any public utility in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-13

.

39-3-13.1.
Power to order refunds.

The division shall have the power, when deemed by it necessary, to provide remedial relief from unjust, unreasonable, or discriminatory acts, or from any matter, act, or thing done by a public utility, which matter, act, or thing is in chapters 1 — 5 of this title, or otherwise, prohibited or declared to be unlawful, to order the public utility to make restitution to any party or parties, individually or as a class, injured by the prohibited or unlawful acts, by way of a cash refund, billing credit, or rate adjustment, or any other form of relief that the division may devise to do equity to the parties. Any award made in restitution shall carry interest from the date of the injury, at the rate of seven percent (7%) from the date of the order of the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 276, § 1.

39-3-14.
Accounting and records of utilities.

The division may, from time to time, establish and prescribe a system of forms of accounts to be used by all public utilities, or may classify the public utilities and prescribe a system of forms of accounts for each class thereof. The accounts of all public utilities shall be kept in accordance with the forms prescribed. The division may also, in its discretion, prescribe the forms of records and memoranda to be kept by the public utilities. The forms of accounts and the forms of records and memoranda prescribed and established by the division with respect to common carriers shall conform as nearly as may be to the similar forms from time to time established and prescribed by the Interstate Commerce Commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 61; P.L. 1918, ch. 1651, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 58; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-14

.

39-3-15.
Security issues for which permission required.

A public utility, as defined in §

39-1-2

, may not, without application to and authority from the division, issue stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness, payable more than twelve (12) months from the date of issue, when necessary for the acquisition of property; the construction, completion, extension, or improvement of its facilities; or for the improvement or maintenance of its service; or for the reorganization or readjustment of its indebtedness and/or capitalization; or for the discharge or lawful refunding of its obligations; or for the reimbursement of money actually expended from income or from any other money in the treasury of the public utility not secured or obtained from the issue of stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the public utility.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-15

; P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 2.

39-3-16.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1, effective August 7, 1996.